Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB223.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 313.040 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A relating to dental hygienists. The administrative regulations may
include at a minimum the classification of and licensure of dental hygienists, by
examination or credentials, general supervision privileges, anesthesia registration,
retirement of a license, reinstatement of a license, and charity licenses.
(2) Renewal programs shall be organized to include continuing education approved by
the board.
(3) A licensed dental hygienist shall practice under the supervision, order, control, and
full responsibility of a dentist licensed under this chapter and may practice:
(a) In a dental office, public or private school, health care facility, or government
institution with a dentist on staff;
(b) Without the physical presence of a supervising dentist as provided in
administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to subsections (6), (7), and
(8) of this section; or
(c) Without a supervising dentist if providing screening services in accordance
with subsection (9) of this section.
(4) It shall be unlawful for a person or corporation to practice dental hygiene in a
manner that is separate or independent from the dental practice of a supervising
dentist or to establish or maintain an office or practice that is primarily devoted to
the provision of dental hygiene services.
(5) A dental hygienist may be employed by the supervising dentist or under contract
with a dentist licensed under this chapter who is one (1) of the following:
(a) The employer of the supervising dentist;
(b) A shareholder in a professional association formed under KRS 274.015 of
Page 1 of 4
BR101400.100 - 1014 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1014
which the supervising dentist is a shareholder;
(c) A member or manager of a limited liability company formed under KRS
275.005 of which the supervising dentist is a member or manager;
(d) A shareholder in a corporation formed under KRS Chapter 271B of which the
supervising dentist is a shareholder;
(e) A partner or employee of a partnership of which the supervising dentist is a
partner or employee; or
(f) A government entity that employs the dental hygienist to provide dental
hygiene services in a public school in connection with other programs the
government entity administers.
(6) A dental hygienist may provide the following procedures in a volunteer community
health setting without the supervision of a dentist:
(a) Dental health education;
(b) Nutritional counseling;
(c) Preparing a generalized oral screening with subsequent referral to a dentist;
(d) Applying fluoride on patients;
(e) Demonstration of oral hygiene technique; and
(f) Sealants.
(7) (a) A dental hygienist may provide, for not more than fifteen (15) consecutive
full business days, dental hygiene services to a patient when the supervising
dentist is not physically present at the location at which the services are
provided if all the following requirements are met:
1. The dental hygienist has at least two (2) years with a minimum of three
thousand (3,000) hours of experience in the practice of dental hygiene;
2. The dental hygienist has successfully completed a course approved by
the board in the identification and prevention of potential medical
emergencies with reregistration in this course every two (2) years;
Page 2 of 4
BR101400.100 - 1014 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1014
3. The dental hygienist complies with written protocols for emergencies
the supervising dentist establishes;
4. The dental hygienist does not examine or provide dental health services
to a patient who has not been examined by the supervising dentist within
the previous seven (7) months. The supervising dentist shall have
completed and evaluated a medical and dental history of the patient and
shall have placed a written order for treatment in the patient's file. The
board shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A to determine guidelines for the written order; and
5. A patient is notified in advance of an appointment for dental hygiene
services when the supervising dentist will be absent from the location.
The patient shall be required to sign an informed consent form, prior to
treatment by the hygienist, acknowledging the dentist's absence.
(b) The board shall promulgate administrative regulations to determine
procedures the dental hygienist shall not be allowed to perform while the
supervising dentist is absent from the work site.
(8) A dental hygienist licensed by the board may practice as a public health hygienist
and may provide dental hygiene services if:
(a) The services are provided as part of a dental health program;
(b) The program for which the hygienist works is operated through the
Department for Public Health,[ or] a governing board of health, or a federally
qualified health center; and
(c) The hygienist performs only accepted standardized protocols which are
contained within the scope of practice of dental hygiene and which are
reviewed and approved by the Board of Dentistry and either the Department
for Public Health or the dentist member of the governing board of health, as
set out in administrative regulation.
Page 3 of 4
BR101400.100 - 1014 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1014
(9) A dental hygienist may provide screening services in any setting without the
supervision of a dentist if:
(a) The screening is conducted to fulfill the requirements of KRS 156.160(1)(j);
and
(b) Patients are informed that the service being provided is a screening and that
only a dentist is licensed to make a definitive diagnosis of the need for dental
care.
Page 4 of 4
BR101400.100 - 1014 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:02 PM Jacketed